Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-116 Immunity. There shall be
no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature shall arise
against any member insurer, the association or its agents or employees, the
board of directors, any person serving as an alternate or substitute
representative of any director, or the commissioner or the commissioner's
representatives for any action taken or any failure to act by them in the
performance of their powers and duties under this part. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 2000, c 93, §13]

Case Notes

Where plaintiff's alleged tortious breach of contract,
emotional distress, and bad faith claims were based on actions of Hawaii
insurance guaranty association, through its agents and employees, in addressing
plaintiff's claim for underinsured motorist benefits, claims barred by this
section. 87 H. 14, 950 P.2d 1214.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next